Connecticut, session 2026, HB05483.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Fertility diagnostic care" means counseling, products,
medications, procedures, genetic testing and services intended to
provide information about an individual's fertility, including, but not
limited to, laboratory assessments and imaging studies;
(2) "Infertility" means (A) the inability to establish or carry a
pregnancy based on an individual's medical, sexual and reproductive
history, age, physical findings, diagnostic testing or any combination of
those factors, including, but not limited to, infertility arising from
disabilities or from medical treatments or conditions associated with a
disability, (B) the need for medical intervention to establish a pregnancy
either as an individual or with a partner, (C) an individual's inability to
establish a pregnancy or carry a pregnancy to live birth after twelve
sHB5483 / File No. 428 1

sHB5483 File No. 428
months of unprotected sexual intercourse when the individual and the
individual's partner have the necessary gametes to establish a
pregnancy, provided a pregnancy loss shall not restart the twelve-
month period, or (D) an individual's inability to establish a pregnancy
or to carry a pregnancy to live birth after six months of unprotected
sexual intercourse due to the individual's age when the individual and
the individual's partner have the necessary gametes to establish a
pregnancy, provided a pregnancy loss shall not restart the six-month
period;
(3) "Intrauterine insemination" means a procedure that places sperm
directly into an individual's uterus at the time of ovulation to increase
the chances of fertilization;
(4) "In-vitro fertilization" or "IVF" means a medical procedure where
an egg is fertilized by sperm in a laboratory setting; and
(5) "Standard fertility preservation services" means counseling,
products, medications, procedures, genetic testing and services
intended to preserve fertility, consistent with established medical
practice and professional guidelines published by the American Society
for Reproductive Medicine or the American Society for Clinical
Oncology, for an individual who (A) has a medical or genetic condition,
including, but not limited to, conditions related to disability or chronic
illness, or (B) is expected to receive medical treatment that has a side
effect or possible side effect of a risk to an individual's fertility and
includes, but is not limited to, expenses related to evaluation, laboratory
assessments, medications and treatment, as well as the procurement and
cryopreservation of gametes, embryos and reproductive material and
storage.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2027, the Commissioner of Social Services
shall provide Medicaid coverage, to the extent permissible under federal
law, for:
(1) Fertility diagnostic care;
sHB5483 / File No. 428 2

sHB5483 File No. 428
(2) Standard fertility preservation services, including, but not limited
to, storage of gametes from the time of cryopreservation, provided
coverage for such storage shall extend until the individual reaches the
age of thirty, or for a period of five years, whichever is later, unless the
commissioner extends the period of time; and
(3) Treatment of infertility, including, but not limited to, (A) any
medically necessary ovulation-enhancing medications and medical
services related to prescribing and monitoring the use of the ovulation-
enhancing medications for at least three cycles of ovulation-enhancing
medication treatment, and (B) at least six cycles of intrauterine
insemination.
(c) In implementing the coverage required in this section, the
Commissioner of Social Services shall not:
(1) Impose a waiting period;
(2) Use any prior diagnosis, an individual's disability or prior fertility
treatment as a basis for excluding, limiting or otherwise restricting the
availability of coverage required under this section;
(3) Impose any limitations on coverage for any fertility services based
on an individual's use of donor gametes; and
(4) Impose different limitations on coverage for, provide different
benefits to or impose different requirements on a class of persons on
account of their age, ancestry, color, disability, ethnicity, gender
identity, genetic information, marital status, national origin, race,
religion, sex or sexual orientation.
(d) The Commissioner of Social Services shall consult with the
Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services on whether in-vitro
fertilization is a medically reasonable and necessary procedure as
required for Medicaid coverage under federal law. Not later than July 1,
2027, the commissioner shall submit a report, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
sHB5483 / File No. 428 3

sHB5483 File No. 428
relating to human services on (1) possible methods for covering IVF as
a Medicaid-covered benefit (A) for fee-for-service and managed care
organizations, and (B) under any applicable Medicaid waiver programs,
and (2) the amount of money that would need to be allocated in federal
and state funds for such coverage.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (a)(2)(C), "and" was changed to "or" for accuracy; in Subsec.
(b)(2), "that" was deleted and "provided the commissioner may extend"
was changed to "unless the commissioner extends" for clarity; and in
Subsec. (d)(1)(A), "both fee-for-service" was changed to "fee-for-service"
for clarity.
HS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5483 / File No. 428 4

sHB5483 File No. 428
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Social Services, Dept. GF - Cost at least at least
$200,000 $500,000-
$5.2 million
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill results in a cost to the Department of Social Services (DSS) of
at least $200,000 in FY 27 and $500,000 to $5.2 million in FY 28 due to
requiring Medicaid coverage for fertility treatment and preservation
services, effective 1/1/27.
Medicaid currently covers family planning services that include
reproductive health exams and lab tests to detect the presence of
conditions affecting reproductive health which include infertility. While
DSS does not currently cover infertility treatment services, fertility
treatment is a Medicaid coverable service and eligible for up to 90%
federal reimbursement.
Cost estimates reflect no-cycle based and medication involved
treatment, preservation services, as well as prenatal and labor and
delivery costs resulting from such treatments. In FY 28, the cost for
treatment and preservation services is estimated to be at least $500,000,
which reflects an assumed state share of 10%. The state will incur
additional costs of approximately $4.7 million (reflecting an assumed
state share of 50%) associated with prenatal, labor and delivery and
postpartum services to the extent these individuals would not otherwise
sHB5483 / File No. 428 5

sHB5483 File No. 428
become pregnant except for the fertility treatment coverage provided by
the bill.
The bill requires DSS to consult with the Centers for Medicare and
Medicaid Services on whether in-vitro fertilization (IVF) is a medically
reasonable and necessary procedure as required for Medicaid coverage
under federal law. DSS must report (by 7/1/27) to the Human Services
committee about possible ways to cover IVF under Medicaid for fee-for-
service and managed care organizations or under Medicaid waiver
programs and the necessary funding to do so. IVF costs are therefore not
included in the above estimates.
To the extent that the treatment provided under the bill is successful
and the children who would not otherwise be born are eligible for
coverage under HUSKY A or HUSKY B, the state will incur additional
costs.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to Medicaid coverage for fertility related
services, utilization rates and success of such treatments.
sHB5483 / File No. 428 6

sHB5483 File No. 428
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5483
AN ACT CONCERNING FERTILITY CARE UNDER THE MEDICAID
PROGRAM.